Utah statutes.
48-2a-801.   Nonjudicial dissolution.

A limited partnership is dissolved and its affairs shall be wound up upon the happening of the first to occur of the following:

(1)  at the time specified in the certificate of limited partnership;

(2)  upon the happening of events specified in writing in the partnership agreement;

(3)  written consent of all partners;

(4)  an event of withdrawal of a general partner unless:

(a)  at the time there is at least one other general partner and the written provisions of the partnership agreement permit the business of the limited partnership to be carried on by the remaining general partner and that partner does so; or

(b)  within 90 days after the event of withdrawal, all partners agree in writing to continue the business of the limited partnership and to the appointment of one or more additional general partners if necessary or desired; or

(5)  entry of a decree of judicial dissolution under Section 48-2a-802.



Amended by Chapter 189, 1991 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

